New Mexico, session 2026, SB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 9-8-4 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1977, Chapter 252, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read: "9-8-4. AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED.--The "health care authority" is created in the executive branch. The authority is a cabinet department and consists of: A. the office of the secretary of health care authority; B. the administrative services division; C. the information technology division; D. the behavioral health services division; E. the developmental disabilities division; F. the health improvement division; G. the medical assistance division; H. the state health benefits division; I. the homelessness reduction division; [I.] J. the child support enforcement division; and [J.] K. the income support division." SECTION 2. A new section of the Health Care Authority Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] HOMELESSNESS REDUCTION DIVISION--DUTIES.-- A. The "homelessness reduction division" is created in the authority and shall be led by the director of homelessness reduction, who shall: (1) oversee the state's homelessness prevention efforts; (2) serve as a policymaker and spokesperson on homelessness prevention; (3) coordinate the state's efforts through legislation, rules and budgets; and (4) communicate with federal and local experts on issues related to homelessness. B. The homelessness reduction division shall: (1) develop and facilitate the implementation of a statewide strategic homelessness reduction plan directed at: (a) decreasing homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization in the state; (b) improving health and human services outcomes for persons who experience homelessness; and (c) strengthening the safety nets that contribute to housing stability; (2) create a statewide data system, which shall be known as the "homeless data integration system", that shall collect local data through homeless management information systems with the goal of matching data on homelessness to programs impacting homeless recipients of state programs; (3) specify the form and substance of the required data elements of the homeless data integration system; (4) identify mainstream resources, benefits and services that can be accessed to prevent and end homelessness in New Mexico; (5) coordinate efforts to reduce homelessness across state agencies; (6) serve within state government and in the state as an advocate for persons experiencing homelessness; and (7) provide leadership for and collaborate with persons developing and implementing local plans to end homelessness in New Mexico, including the homelessness reduction advisory council. C. Upon the creation of the homeless data integration system, all continuums of care operating in New Mexico shall provide collected data elements, including health information, in a manner consistent with federal law, to the homeless data integration system. D. Health information or personal identifying information provided to or maintained within the homeless data integration system shall not be subject to inspection pursuant to the Inspection of Public Records Act." SECTION 3. A new section of the Health Care Authority Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] INTERAGENCY HOMELESSNESS REDUCTION TASK FORCE--CREATED--DUTIES.-- A. The "interagency homelessness reduction task force" is created and is administratively attached to the authority. The task force consists of the following members: (1) the director of the homelessness reduction division of the authority; (2) the chief executive officer of the New Mexico mortgage finance authority or the chief executive officer's designee; (3) the secretary of economic development or the secretary's designee; (4) the secretary of finance and administration or the secretary's designee; (5) the secretary of public education or the secretary's designee; (6) the secretary of higher education or the secretary's designee; (7) the secretary of Indian affairs or the secretary's designee; (8) the secretary of workforce solutions or the secretary's designee; (9) the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee; (10) the secretary of veterans' services or the secretary's designee; (11) the secretary of children, youth and families or the secretary's designee; (12) the secretary of early childhood education and care or the secretary's designee; (13) the secretary of aging and long-term services or the secretary's designee; (14) the secretary of public safety or the secretary's designee; (15) the secretary of health or the secretary's designee; and (16) the chair of the homelessness reduction advisory council. B. The chair of the interagency homelessness reduction task force shall be the director of the homelessness reduction division of the authority or the director's designee, and the vice chair of the task force shall be the chair of the homelessness reduction advisory council. The task force shall meet at the call of the chair. C. The interagency homelessness reduction task force shall advise the homelessness reduction division on initiatives for decreasing homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization in New Mexico, improving health and human services outcomes for persons who experience homelessness and strengthening the safety nets that contribute to housing stability. D. The interagency homelessness reduction task force shall recommend: (1) policy, regulatory and resource changes necessary to: (a) accomplish goals and objectives set forth in the statewide strategic homelessness reduction plan; and (b) ensure accountability, results and success in reducing homelessness; (2) resources for successful implementation of the statewide strategic homelessness reduction plan and oversee that implementation; and (3) strategies for effective interagency collaboration and system integration to draft policies addressing the intersection of homelessness and poverty. E. The interagency homelessness reduction task force may solicit feedback from stakeholders and advocates to advise the task force on policy and implementation recommendations. F. By October 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the interagency homelessness reduction task force shall submit a report to the governor, the appropriate interim legislative committee, the legislative finance committee and the homelessness reduction division regarding: (1) the task force's work during the prior fiscal year; (2) recommendations developed by the task force and those made by the homelessness reduction advisory council regarding implementation of the statewide strategic homelessness reduction plan and initiatives; and (3) key outcomes and measures related to homelessness in New Mexico." SECTION 4. A new section of the Health Care Authority Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] HOMELESSNESS REDUCTION ADVISORY COUNCIL--CREATED--DUTIES--MEMBERSHIP.-- A. The "homelessness reduction advisory council" is created and is administratively attached to the authority. The advisory council shall advise the interagency homelessness reduction task force and the director of the homelessness reduction division of the authority and recommend strategies to: (1) prevent and decrease homelessness and unnecessary institutionalization; (2) improve health and human services outcomes for persons experiencing homelessness; (3) strengthen the safety nets that contribute to housing stability; and (4) develop and achieve the goals of the statewide strategic homelessness reduction plan and initiatives pursuant to the provisions of Section 2 of this 2026 act. B. The homelessness reduction advisory council consists of the following members appointed by the governor, who shall reflect the racial, ethnic and geographic diversity of New Mexico: (1) three members with lived experience of homelessness or housing insecurity, which may include formerly incarcerated persons, veterans and individuals sixteen to twenty-five years of age; (2) one member representing individuals with disabilities; (3) two members representing the philanthropic private-funding sector; (4) one member representing a statewide behavioral health advocacy organization; (5) one member representing a statewide housing advocacy organization; (6) two members representing local continuums of care organizations; (7) three members representing regional or local units of government; (8) one member representing an organization that supports victims of domestic violence; and (9) four members representing providers of the homeless response system, including emergency supportive housing, rapid rehousing, permanent supportive housing, homeless youth programs and homelessness prevention. C. The director of the homelessness reduction division may appoint as ex-officio, nonvoting members of the homelessness reduction advisory council any state agency staff the director deems necessary. D. The chair of the homelessness reduction advisory council shall be elected by the members of the advisory council. E. Public members of the homelessness reduction advisory council may receive per diem and mileage pursuant to the Per Diem and Mileage Act. F. The authority shall provide the necessary staff and administrative support to the homelessness reduction advisory council. G. On or before September 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, the homelessness reduction advisory council shall submit its findings and recommendations to the interagency homelessness reduction task force." SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the health care authority for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to fund the operation of the homelessness reduction division of the health care authority, the interagency homelessness reduction task force and the homelessness reduction advisory council. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is July 1, 2026. - 10 -